Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.100

Right to use brand—Brand as evidence of title.

The right to use a brand shall be evidenced by the original certificate issued by the director showing that the brand is of present record or a certified copy of the record of the brand showing that it is of present record. A healed brand of record on livestock shall be prima facie evidence that the recorded owner of the brand has legal title to the livestock and is entitled to its possession. The director may require additional proof of ownership for any animal showing more than one healed brand.

[ 2003 c 326 s 12; 1971 ex.s. c 135 s 3; 1959 c 54 s 10.]